Mississippi, session 2026, HB1041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  As used in this act, the following terms have the meanings as defined in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Commission" means the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission. (b) "Levee project" means a levee system bordering portions of the Yazoo River, within Yazoo County, and funded by Federal grants and/or appropriations. (c) "Political subdivision" means any agency, board, department or commission of the State of Mississippi or of the Federal government, and any political subdivision of the State of Mississippi. (2)  The Commission shall be authorized to construct a levee project and perform, without limitation, all necessary construction, pre-construction and design activities, including environmental mitigation activities and right of way acquisition. (3)  The Commission shall be authorized to enter into contracts with public and private entities, as it deems necessary, to carry out the purposes of this section. (4)  The authority granted under this section shall be construed liberally to authorize the performance of any and all activities necessary to construct the levee project. (5)  The Commission shall be authorized to maintain the levee project and to contract with one or more political subdivisions for such maintenance for a period not to exceed ninety-nine (99) years and shall further have power to cede all rights of way and levees and the maintenance, management and control thereof to the federal government.  A political subdivision may provide funding to defray the cost to maintain the Levee Project. SECTION 2.  Section 69-27-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 69-27-13.  The State Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall have the following duties and powers: (a)  To offer any assistance as may be appropriate to the commissioners of soil and water conservation districts in the carrying out of their powers and programs. (b)  To keep the commissioners of each of the districts informed of the activities and experience of all other districts, and to facilitate cooperation between districts. (c)  To coordinate the programs of the soil and water conservation districts. (d)  To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies and of agencies of this state in the work of the districts. (e)  To disseminate information concerning the activities and programs of the soil and water conservation districts, and to encourage the formation of districts. (f)  To seek and receive grants of monies, and other assets, from any source to carry out this article. (g)  To distribute any appropriated or other funds or assets under its control, from state, federal or other governmental agencies or political subdivisions, or from private grants, including matching funds to districts. (h)  To establish and administer qualification standards for district commissioners and officers. (i)  To give guidance and overall supervision to districts when assistance is requested, or acceptable. (j)  To study, classify and evaluate land use needs and problems in the State of Mississippi; to make recommendations leading to adoption of land use policy and broad guidelines for meeting the needs and problems so identified. (k)  To demonstrate to landowners and operators within the state, equipment that will demonstrate energy and soil and water conservation. (l)  To enter into and to authorize the executive director to execute with the approval of the commission, contracts, grants, cooperative agreements and memoranda of understanding with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution location inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the purposes of this article. (m)  To cooperate with the Commission on Environmental Quality in addressing agricultural nonpoint source pollution.  Subject to Section 49-17-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, the Commission on Environmental Quality and the commission shall enter into a memorandum of understanding which shall establish the commission's role in nonpoint source pollution issues. (n)  To construct a levee project and to perform and enter into contracts to perform related construction and design activities as provided in Section 1 of this act. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.